Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTHFIELD; MARKED TRUNK HIGHWAY 19 ROUNDABOUT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,070,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation to design and construct a roundabout on marked Trunk Highway 19 at the intersection with Armstrong Road in the city of Northfield. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of proceeds of trunk highway bonds. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 1 from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,070,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end